Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 5. Miscellaneous.
§ 13.1-522.
Civil liabilities.

Any person who: (i) sells a security in violation of §§

13.1-502

,

13.1-504

A, 13.1-507 (i) or (ii),

13.1-510 (e)

or (f), or (ii) sells a security by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or any omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statement made, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading (the purchaser not knowing of such untruth or omission), and who shall not sustain the burden of proof that he did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of such untruth or omission, shall be liable to the person purchasing such security from him who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the consideration paid for such security, together with interest thereon at the annual rate of six percent, costs, and reasonable attorneys’ fees, less the amount of any income received on the security, upon the tender of such security, or for the substantial equivalent in damages if he no longer owns the security.

Any person who (i) engages in the business of advising others, for compensation, either directly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or as to the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities, or who, for compensation and as a part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports concerning securities in willful and material violation of §

13.1-503

, subsection A of §

13.1-504

, or of any rule or order under §

13.1-505.1

, or (ii) receives, directly or indirectly, any consideration from another person for advice as to the value of securities or their purchase or sale, whether through the issuance of analyses, reports or otherwise and employs any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud such other person or engages in any act, practice or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit on such other person, shall be liable to that person who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the consideration paid for such advice and any loss due to such advice, together with interest thereon at the annual rate of six percent from the date of payment of the consideration plus costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, less the amount of any income received from such advice and any other economic advantage.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable under subsection A or B of this section, including every partner, officer, or director of such a person, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, every employee of such a person who materially aids in the conduct giving rise to the liability, and every broker-dealer, investment advisor, investment advisor representative or agent who materially aids in such conduct shall be liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such person, unless able to sustain the burden of proof that he did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist. There shall be contribution as in cases of contract among the several persons so liable.

No suit shall be maintained to enforce any liability created under this section unless brought within two years after the transaction upon which it is based; provided, that, if any person liable by reason of subsection A, B or C of this section makes a written offer, before suit is brought, to refund the consideration paid and any loss due to any investment advice provided by such person, together with interest thereon at the annual rate of six percent, less the amount of any income received on the security or resulting from such advice, or to pay damages if the purchaser no longer owns the security, no purchaser or user of the investment advisory service shall maintain a suit under this section who has refused or failed to accept such offer within thirty days of its receipt.

Any tender specified in this section may be made at any time before entry of judgment.

Any condition, stipulation or provision binding any person acquiring any security or receiving any investment advice to waive compliance with any provision of this chapter or of any rule or order thereunder shall be void.

The rights and remedies provided by this chapter shall be in addition to any and all other rights and remedies that may exist at law or in equity.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-150; 1956, c. 428; 1987, c. 678; 1997, c. 279.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia property law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1583 (1974).

For survey of Virginia law on practice and pleading for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1799 (1975).

For note, “Auditors’ Liability-Adoption of a Reasonable Foreseeability Standard,” see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 221 (1983).

For article, “The Applicability of Local Securities Acts to Multi-State Securities Transactions,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 139 (1985).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12A M.J. Limitation of Actions, § 11.

§ 13.1-523.
Rules and forms.

The Commission shall have authority from time to time to make, amend and rescind such rules and forms as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including rules and forms governing registration statements, applications and reports, and defining accounting, technical and trade terms used in this chapter insofar as such definitions are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter. Among other things, the Commission shall have authority, for the purposes of this chapter, to prescribe the content and form of financial statements and to direct whether they should be certified by independent public or certified accountants. For the purpose of rules and forms, the Commission may classify securities, persons and matters within its jurisdiction and prescribe different requirements for different classes.

All such rules and forms shall be available for distribution at the office of the Commission either in printed or electronic format.

No provision of this chapter imposing any liability shall apply to any act done or omitted in conformity with any rule of the Commission, notwithstanding that such rule may, after such act or omission, be amended, rescinded or found for any reason to be invalid.

History.

1956, c. 428; 2003, c. 595.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 595 redesignated subsections (a) thorough (c) as subsections A through C; and in subsection B, deleted “printed or mimeographed” preceding “available,” and inserted “either in printed or electronic format” at the end.

§ 13.1-523.1.
Commission authority to regulate securities and investment advisory activities.

The Commission shall have all the power, authority and jurisdiction reserved to or conferred upon the states by the federal National Securities Markets Improvement Act of 1996 (Pub. L. No. 104-290 (1996)) to regulate securities and investment advisory activities, including the authority to require the registration of persons and securities, the filing of documents, notices, reports and information, and the payment of fees, and to exercise its administrative, investigative, judicial and legislative powers with respect thereto. The Commission shall have the authority to make, amend and rescind such rules and forms in conformance with the National Securities Markets Improvement Act of 1996 as may be necessary for the regulation of securities and investment advisory activities and transactions within its jurisdiction.

The Commission may by rule or order, with respect to any security that is a federal covered security under § 18(b)(4)(C) of the Securities Act of 1933, require the issuer to file a notice together with a consent to service of process where (i) the principal place of business of the issuer is in the Commonwealth or (ii) purchasers of 50 percent or more of the securities sold by the issuer pursuant to an offering made in reliance on § 18(b)(4)(C) of the Securities Act of 1933 are residents of the Commonwealth. The Commission may assess and collect in connection with any filing pursuant to this subsection a nonrefundable filing fee not to exceed $100.

History.

1997, c. 279; 2017, c. 754.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 754 designated the existing paragraph as subsection A, and added subsection B.

§ 13.1-524.
Certain records of Commission available to public; admissibility of copies; destruction.

The information contained in or filed with any registration statement, application or report shall be available to the public at the office of the Commission. Copies thereof certified by the clerk under the seal of the Commission shall be admissible in evidence in lieu of the originals, and the originals shall not be removed from the office of the Commission. But papers, documents and files may be destroyed by the Commission when, in its opinion, they no longer serve any useful purpose.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-525.
Official interpretations.

The Commission shall have jurisdiction, upon written application, payment of a filing fee of $500 and submission of such data as may be necessary for the purpose, to determine whether or not (i) a particular security or transaction is exempt from the registration requirements of this chapter, (ii) the offer or sale of a particular security would be lawful, or (iii) a person is an investment advisor or an investment advisor representative. Its determination shall be made by order, which, subject to the right of appeal, shall be conclusive on the same state of facts in any court in which the matter may come for adjudication, whether in a civil or a criminal case.

History.

Code 1950, § 13-112; 1956, c. 428; 1984, c. 771; 1992, c. 19.

§ 13.1-525.1.
Fees to cover expense of regulation.

The fees paid into the state treasury under this chapter, except for fees and funds collected for the Literary Fund, shall be deposited into a special fund and specifically accounted for and used by the State Corporation Commission to defray the costs of supervising, implementing, and administering the provisions of this chapter and Chapters 6 (§

13.1-528

et seq.) and 8 (§

13.1-557

et seq.) of this title, and Chapters 6.1 (§ 59.1-92.1 et seq.) and 7 (§ 59.1-93 et seq.) of Title 59.1. Included in the Commission’s costs shall be a reasonable margin in the nature of a reserve fund. All excesses of fees collected exceeding these costs shall revert to the general fund.

History.

1987, c. 434.

Editor’s note.

Chapter 6 (§

13.1-528

et seq.) of Title 13.1, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1989, c. 408.

§ 13.1-526.
Transition.

Registrations of dealers and agents under prior law shall continue as registrations as broker-dealers and agents under this chapter until April 30 following the effective date of this chapter. Licenses issued under § 13-128 of the Code of 1950 shall continue in effect until April 30 following the effective date of this chapter. The exemption provided for regularly established dealers by § 13-113 (11), whenever the requirements of §§ 13-116 to 13-121 inclusive have been complied with prior to the effective date of this chapter, shall continue in effect until April 30 following the effective date of this chapter and all securities for which a registration is in effect pursuant to that exemption on the effective date of the repeal of § 13-113 (11) shall be deemed to have been registered by notification under this chapter. But such registrations, licenses and exemptions may be terminated by the Commission for causes justifying termination of registrations under this chapter.

History.

1956, c. 428.

Cross references.

For present provision as to exemption of securities and transactions from registration requirements, see §

13.1-514

.

§ 13.1-527.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Securities Act.

History.

1956, c. 428.

§ 13.1-527.01.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

13.1-527.01

, pertaining to severability, derived from 1981, c. 169.